Hawaii statutes.
[§657D-7] Exercise of rights not to
affect lenders, credit, or insurers. Application by a person in military
service for, or receipt by a person in military service of, a stay,
postponement, or suspension pursuant to this chapter in the payment of any tax,
fine, penalty, insurance premium, or other civil obligation or liability of
that person shall not by itself provide the basis for any of the following:

(1) A determination by any lender or other person
that the person in military service is unable to pay the civil obligation or
liability in accordance with its terms;

(2) With respect to a credit transaction between a
creditor and the person in military service:

(A) A denial or revocation of credit by the
creditor;

(B) A change by the creditor in the terms of
an existing credit arrangement; or

(C) A refusal by the creditor to grant credit
to such person in substantially the amount or on substantially the terms
requested;

(3) An adverse report on the creditworthiness of the
person in military service by or to any person or entity engaged in the
practice of assembling or evaluating consumer credit information; or

(4) A refusal by an insurer to insure the person. [L
1994, c 257, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next